apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="/dir__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vo</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>voi</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vas</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>va</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vamos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vais</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>van</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ui</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuisti</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuesti</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fosti</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>foi</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fo</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuimos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuemos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fomos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuistis</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuestis</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fostis</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueron</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>foron</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>

      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diba</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dibes</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diba</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>díbamos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>díbemos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dibais</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>dibeis</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>diben</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuera</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuere</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fora</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fore</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueras</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fueres</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>foras</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fores</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuera</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuere</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fora</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fore</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuéramos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuéremos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fóramos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fóremos</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fuerais</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fuereis</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>forais</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>foreis</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>fueran</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>fueren</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	  
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>foran</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	 
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>foren</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>	   
	  
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>vaya</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>vaiga</l> 
          <r>dir<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
        </p>
      </e>

    <e><i/><par n="/dir__vblex"/></e>
    <e><i/><par n="/dir__vblex"/></e>
